Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 3. Right to Attend School

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

AIDS infection as affecting right to attend public school, 60 ALR4th 15.

§ 21-4-301.
Schools to be free and accessible to all children; minimum school year.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the public schools of each school district in the state shall at all times be equally free and accessible to all children resident therein of five (5) years of age as of August 1, or September 15 if pursuant to an approved request under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxxviii), of the year in which they may register in kindergarten as provided in W.S. 21-4-302(b) and under the age of twenty-one (21), subject to regulations of the board of trustees. Each school district shall operate its schools and its classes for a minimum of one hundred seventy-five (175) days each school year unless an alternative schedule has been approved by the state board. Prior to submission of a proposed alternative schedule to the state board, the board of trustees shall hold at least two (2) advertised public meetings within the district, at which the board shall present the proposed alternative schedule and respond to public questions and comments. Any school district operating under an alternative schedule shall annually evaluate the effectiveness of that schedule in meeting the educational goals and purposes for which the schedule was adopted.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 93, § 1; 1909, ch. 31, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 1956; C.S. 1920, § 2260; Laws 1923, ch. 42, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 99-334; C.S. 1945, § 67-1601; W.S. 1957, § 21-244; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 57; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-57; Laws 1985, ch. 122, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 501; 2020 ch. 159, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to mentally, physically, psychologically or socially handicapped child having right to free, appropriate education, see §

21-2-501

.

As to providing public school system for all children, see art. 7, § 1; art. 21, § 28, Wyo. Const.

Summer school grant program

Laws 2007, ch. 147, § 2, amends Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 3, and states in relevant part:

“[SUMMER SCHOOL/EXTENDED DAY/ENRICHMENT PROGRAMS]

“(a)

The summer school grant program is established for the 2006 and 2007 summer sessions to provide financial assistance to districts for the provision of intervention, remediation and enrichment instruction to students beyond the required school year specified by law under W.S.

21-4-301

and 21-13-307(a)(ii). The grant program shall augment amounts within the education resource block grant model for addressing at-risk student needs over a transitional period during which full cost-based funding will be implemented and total at-risk program resources are being reviewed. Assistance made available under the grant program shall supplement district intervention, remediation and enrichment programs and shall at minimum, be made available to students requiring additional instruction to master statewide content and performance standards prescribed by the state board of education under W.S. 21-2-304(a)(iii) or otherwise seeking credit recovery for promotion to the subsequent grade level. Summer school programs eligible for assistance under this section shall also:

“(ii)

Provide a minimum of sixty (60) instructional hours to each elementary school student and a minimum of sixty (60) instructional hours to each middle and high school student. High school students may demonstrate proficiency prior to receiving the full sixty (60) hours of instruction;

“(b)

In addition to subsection (a) of this section, programs providing enrichment instruction to students and before-school, after-school and Saturday school enhanced instruction for student mastery of the state content and performance standards are eligible for assistance under this section. Before-school, after-school and Saturday school programs for student mastery of state standards shall augment amounts within the education resource block grant model for addressing at-risk student needs over a transitional period during which full cost-based funding will be implemented and total at-risk program resources are being reviewed. To receive funding eligibility under this subsection, a district shall file program plans with the department of education requesting use of a portion of summer school program funds otherwise available under this section, not to exceed a maximum level established by rule and regulation of the department. Plans submitted to the department shall be filed within the time specifications imposed upon the applicant district for summer school grants and shall be subject to program requirements and criteria established by the department.

“(c)

To receive grant assistance under this section, a district shall apply to the department of education on or before April 15, 2006, and by April 15, 2007 for the 2007 summer school session and the 2007-2008 school year, as applicable. Application review by the department shall be completed by May 1 of the appropriate year. On or before May 1, 2006, and May 1, 2007, as applicable, districts shall be notified by the department of any estimated grant amount to be made available to the district during the appropriate summer school session and school year. Application to the department shall be in a manner and form prescribed by the department and shall include:

“(f)

As soon as reasonably possible following the effective date of this section as amended by the 2007 Wyoming legislature, the department of education shall notify school districts of the availability of assistance under the summer school grant program established under this section and of the requirements imposed upon districts to obtain a grant award.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 1, 2021, substituted “as of August 1, or September 15 if pursuant to an approved request under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxxvii), of the year in which they may register in kindergarten as provided in W.S. 21-4-302(b)” for “as of September 15 of the applicable school year.”

No educational services after age 21. —

A county school district is neither entitled nor obligated to provide educational services for individuals within the district after the recipient reaches his or her twenty-first birthday. Natrona County Sch. Dist. v. Ryan, 764 P.2d 1019,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1988).

School district is not authorized to adopt four-day school week,

resulting in a 144-day school year. Johnston v. Board of Trustees, 661 P.2d 1045,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1983).

School year to be 175 separate days. —

Under this section, the legislature fully intends that students be at school on 175 separate days during a school year. Johnston v. Board of Trustees, 661 P.2d 1045,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1983).

High schools. —

The words “public schools” include high schools. State ex rel. School Dist. v. School Dist., 45 Wyo. 365, 18 P.2d 1010,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1933).

Educational opportunity held not denied. —

Where two students were expelled for one year for selling marijuana, the state constitution did not require that the school district had to provide them with an alternate education; they had been lawfully expelled, the district's actions were the least onerous means of accomplishing its compelling interest in providing for the safety and welfare of its students, and the students had not been denied all educational opportunity as they could have chosen to return to school after their suspensions. RM v. Washakie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 2004 WY 162, 102 P.3d 868,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 2004).

Law reviews. —

For comment on Goss v. Lopez, 419 U.S. 565, 95 S. Ct. 729, 42 L. Ed. 2d 725, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 23 (1975), and particularly its effect in Wyoming, see X Land & Water L. Rev. 607 (1975).

For comment, “Education for Handicapped Children in Wyoming: What Constitutes a Free Appropriate Public Education and Other Administrative Hurdles,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 225 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Standing to challenge college or professional school admissions program which gives preference to minority or disadvantaged applicants, 60 ALR Fed 612.

§ 21-4-302.
Age for registration in first grade and kindergarten; preschool programs.

A pupil may register in the first grade in the public schools of this state in the year in which his sixth birthday falls on or before August 1, or September 15 if the child started kindergarten pursuant to an approved request under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxxviii).

A pupil may register in kindergarten in the public schools of this state in the year in which his fifth birthday falls on or before August 1, or September 15 if pursuant to an approved request under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxxviii).

The board of trustees of a school district may permit the enrollment of pupils in a part-time preschool program with a curriculum based on developmentally appropriate practices funded by the district. The school district may:

Contract with a preschool program to operate the preschool. The program may use school district facilities or facilities which are provided by others and may utilize the services of personnel who are not school district personnel and which are provided by others;

Establish a minimum attendance age for the program, but a pupil must have attained at least his third birthday on or before August 1 of the year in which that pupil enrolls. A pupil who enrolls in such a preschool program shall not be included within the district’s average daily membership (ADM) for purposes of receiving state funds or within any other school funding formula for purposes of receiving funds from the state, unless the pupil has attained the minimum age for registration in kindergarten as provided in subsection (b) of this section;

Provide, or contract with an outside organization to provide, technical assistance, including occasional classroom instruction regardless of the regularity of such occasional classroom instruction, to preschool programs. Technical assistance may be provided to preschool programs on the basis of location, date of application for such assistance by a program, random selection of a program, or family income, home location, eligibility for a federal program or other socioeconomic characteristics which correlate with risk for unsuccessful academic performance of pupils attending the program. No preschool program shall be required to receive such technical assistance. A district shall not receive any additional financial assistance from the state if the district chooses to provide technical assistance to a preschool program under this paragraph.

A program shall not discriminate in enrollment on the basis of sex, race, religion or national origin.

A school district which provides a preschool program under subsection (c) of this section biennially shall assess, through the fourth grade when practical, the school readiness and academic performance of pupils who participate in the program as compared with those who do not participate in the program. The results of any assessment required by this subsection shall be open for public inspection.

Nothing in this section supersedes W.S.

21-2-701

through

21-2-705

.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 192, § 1; 1957, ch. 28, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-245; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 58; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-59; Laws 2000, ch. 60, § 1; 2019 ch. 102, § 1, effective February 26, 2019; 2020 ch. 159, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

The 2019 amendment,

in (e), deleted the second sentence, which read: "The district shall report the results of the assessment to the department of education and the department shall report the results to the joint education interim committee of the legislature on or before October 1 of each even numbered year."

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 1, 2021, in (a) substituted “before August 1, or September 15 if the child started kindergarten pursuant to an approved request under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxxviii)” for “before September 15”; in (b) substituted “before August 1, or September 15 if pursuant to an approved request under W.S. 21-3-110(a)(xxxviii)” for “before September 15”; and in (c)(ii) substituted “before August 1” for “before September 15.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2019, ch. 102 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2019.

Editor’s notes.
—

Laws 2020, Ch. 159, § 2, states: “The change in the age requirement for registering in the first grade as provided in this act shall not apply to students who were registered to attend kindergarten in the public schools of this state during school year 2020-2021.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 108, § 801, as amended by Laws 2005, ch. 121, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, provides:

“(a) To provide financial assistance to school districts for the provision of full-day kindergarten programs, each school district shall for school years 2004-2005 and 2005-2006, receive an amount payable from the school foundation program account determined in accordance with subsection (b) of this section. This payment shall be made by the department of education from amounts within the foundation program account appropriated by the legislature for purposes of this section and shall be in addition to the foundation program amount determined for each district under W.S. 21-13-309(p). If there is an insufficient amount within the foundation program account for payments under this section, the department shall make a pro rata reduction in the payments to districts for each kindergarten student.

“(b) School year 2004-2005 payments to school districts for full-day kindergarten programs shall be computed by multiplying the number of students enrolled in full-day kindergarten programs within each district during school year 2004-2005 by one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), and shall be distributed to districts on February 15 together with foundation program distributions for school year 2004-2005 under W.S.

21-13-313

. School year 2005-2006 payments to school district for full-day kindergarten programs shall be computed by multiplying the number of students enrolled in full-day kindergarten programs within each district during school year 2005-2006 by one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), and shall be distributed to districts together with school year 2005-2006 foundation program distributions under W.S.

21-13-313

. For purposes of computations under this subsection, the kindergarten enrollment count for each district shall be the enrollment taken during October, 2004 and October, 2005, as applicable.

“(c) Each district shall report expenditures of amounts distributed under subsection (b) of this section to the department in the manner and at the time specified by the department. Not later than September 1, 2005, for school year 2004-2005 distributions, and September 1, 2006, for school year 2005-2006 distributions, the department shall provide a report of expenditures broken down by district and expenditure category to the joint education interim committee.

“(d) Any charter school operating within a district and providing a full-day kindergarten program under a contract with the district shall be eligible for funding from the district through payment distributions available to the district under this section.”

Laws 2005, ch. 121, § 3, appropriates $6,200,000 from the school foundation program account to the department of education for distributions to school districts for full-day kindergarten programs during school year 2005-2006 as authorized under the act.

Quoted

in

Natrona County Sch. Dist. v. Ryan, 764 P.2d 1019,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1988).

§ 21-4-302.1.
Advance enrollment for children of transferred military personnel.

For purposes of registration with a school district, a pupil shall be considered a resident of this state if the pupil’s parent or guardian is transferred to or is pending transfer to the state while on active military duty pursuant to an official military order.

For pupils qualifying under subsection (a) of this section, school districts shall accept enrollment requests electronically. If a school district allows enrollment requests for a pupil to attend a specific school or program, the school district shall allow the enrollment request to be submitted electronically for a pupil qualifying under subsection (a) of this section.

For pupils qualifying under subsection (a) of this section, a parent or guardian shall provide proof of residence to the pupil’s school district within ten (10) days after the pupil first attends the school district.

As used in this section, “active military duty” means full-time duty status in the active uniformed service of the United States, including members of the national guard and reserve on active duty orders.

History.

2021 ch. 71, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 71, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.

§ 21-4-303.
Right not denied on account of sex, race or religion.

No child shall be denied the right to attend the public schools of this state on account of sex, race, or religion.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 59; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-59.

Cross references. —

As to prohibition against discrimination on account of sex, race or color, see art. 7, § 10, Wyo. Const.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Racial segregation in schools, 38 ALR2d 1188.

De facto segregation of races in public schools, 11 ALR3d 780.

Validity, under federal law, of sex discrimination in athletics, 23 ALR Fed 664.

What constitutes reverse or majority race or national origin discrimination violative of federal constitution or statutes — nonemployment cases 152 ALR Fed 1.

Sex discrimination in public education under Title IX — Supreme Court cases, 158 ALR Fed 563.

What constitutes reverse sex or gender discrimination against males violative of federal constitution or statutes — Nonemployment cases, 166 ALR Fed 1.

§ 21-4-304.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 138, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1905, ch. 67, § 28, related to admission without examination to institutions of higher learning.

§ 21-4-305.
Suspension or expulsion; authority; procedure.

The board of trustees of any school district is authorized to suspend or expel a student subject to the requirements to provide notice and an opportunity to be heard as set forth in this section. The board of trustees may delegate the authority to suspend or expel a student to disciplinarians chosen from the administrative and supervisory staff.

No student shall be suspended or expelled from school without notice as set forth in this subsection and an opportunity to be heard as set forth in subsection (c) of this section. To provide notice the disciplinarian shall:

Give the student to be suspended or expelled oral or written notice of the charges against him and an explanation of the evidence the authorities have;

In good faith attempt to notify the student’s parents, guardians or custodians within twenty-four (24) hours of the student’s suspension or expulsion and the reasons for the suspension or expulsion, using contact information on record with the school or district. The disciplinarian shall keep record of the efforts to provide notice under this paragraph and whether the notice was provided successfully;

Give the student to be suspended or expelled an opportunity to be heard and to present his version of the charges against him as set forth in subsection (c) of this section;

To provide an opportunity to be heard the disciplinarian shall give every student to be suspended or expelled the opportunity to be heard as soon as practicable after the misconduct, and in accordance with the following, unless a student requests an extension of time and the board of trustees or the disciplinarian designee of the board approves the extension:

For a suspension of ten (10) school days or less, notice shall be provided in accordance with paragraph (b)(ii) of this section and a student shall be provided an opportunity to be heard before a student is removed unless the student’s presence endangers persons or property or threatens disruption of the academic process, in which case his immediate removal from school may be justified, but the opportunity to be heard shall follow as soon as practicable, and not later than seventy-two (72) hours after his removal, not counting Saturdays and Sundays;

For a suspension or expulsion longer than ten (10) school days a hearing shall be held in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and, unless the student requests an extension and the board or the disciplinarian designee of the board approves an extension, the hearing shall be held within ten (10) business days, or as soon thereafter as is reasonably practicable, after the supervisory staff disciplinarian recommends suspension or expulsion to the appropriate administrator. The student’s suspension shall continue until the hearing is held.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 164, § 2.

Suspension or expulsion shall not be imposed as an additional punishment for offenses punishable under the laws of the state, except for expulsion by a district superintendent under subsection (a) of this section, or where the offense was committed at a school function, against the property of the school, or is of such nature that continuation of the child in school would clearly be detrimental to the education, welfare, safety or morals of other pupils. No suspension or expulsion shall be for longer than one (1) year.

Any decision of the board, or of a designated superintendent, shall be considered a final decision which may be appealed to the district court of the county in which the school district is located, pursuant to provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. The court may, on application or on its own motion, stay the decision of the board or superintendent pending appeal, considering both the best interests of the child and the need to maintain an orderly environment conducive to learning for other children.

As used in this chapter, an “opportunity to be heard” means at a minimum a meeting in which the disciplinarian or his designee provides the substantive information regarding the suspension or expulsion to the student to be suspended, and the student to be suspended may dispute the substantive information provided. An opportunity to be heard does not require a formal hearing in accordance with the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act except as provided in paragraph (c)(ii) of this section.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 69, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-61.1; Laws 1995, ch. 57, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 501; 1998, ch. 49, § 1; ch. 73, § 1; 2019 ch. 164, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2019.

2019 Amendments.—

The first amendment, by ch. 164 § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (a), substituted "school district is authorized to suspend or expel a student subject to the requirements to provide notice and an opportunity to be heard as set forth in this section. The board of trustees may delegate the authority to suspend or expel a student" for "school district may delegate authority," and "staff" for "staff to suspend any student from school for a period not to exceed ten (10) school days. In addition, the board of trustees shall, subject to the case-by-case modification permitted by this subsection, require the district superintendent to expel from school for a period of one (1) year any student determined to possess, use, transfer, carry or sell a deadly weapon as defined under W.S. 6-1-104(a)(iv) within any school bus as defined by W.S. 31-7-102(a)(xl) or within the boundaries of real property used by the district primarily for the education of students in grades kindergarten through twelve (12). The superintendent with the approval of the board of trustees may modify the period of expulsion on a case-by-case basis based upon the circumstances of the violation. Upon a violation of this subsection and following notice and hearing requirements of this section, the superintendent shall notify the district attorney of the violation together with the specific act in violation of this subsection and the name of the student violating this subsection. Nothing in this subsection prohibits a district from providing educational services to the expelled student in an alternative setting"; in the introductory language in (b), added "No student shall be suspended or expelled from school without notice as set forth in this subsection and an opportunity to be heard as set forth in subsection (c) of this section. To provide notice" preceding "the disciplinarian" and made related changes, designated (b)(i), in (b)(i) and (c), added "or expelled" following "suspended" and made related changes, designated (b)(ii) and substituted "In good faith attempt to notify the student's parents, guardians or custodians within twenty-four (24) hours of the student's suspension or expulsion and the reasons for the suspension or expulsion, using contact information on record with the school or district. The disciplinarian shall keep record of the efforts to provide notice under this paragraph and whether the notice was provided successfully" for "The disciplinarian shall," designated (b)(iii), added "or expelled" following "suspended" and substituted "as set forth in" for "No student shall be removed from school without such notice and opportunity to be heard, except as provided by"; in the introductory language in (c), added "To provide an opportunity to be heard" at the beginning, substituted "every student" for "the student," added "and in accordance with the following, unless a student requests an extension of time and the board of trustees or the disciplinarian designee of the board approves the extension" following "misconduct," added designation (c)(i) and "For a suspension of ten (10) school days or less, notice shall be provided in accordance with paragraph (b)(ii) of this section and a student shall be provided an opportunity to be heard before a student is removed" preceding "unless," deleted the last sentence, which read: "Written notice of suspension shall be sent to the student's parents, guardians or custodians within twenty-four (24) hours of the decision to conduct them," and made stylistic and related changes, and added (c)(ii); and added (g).

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 164 § 2, effective July 1, 2019, repealed (d), which read: "The board of trustees of any school district or the superintendent if designated, may suspend a student for a period exceeding ten (10) school days or may expel a student for a period not to exceed one (1) year, provided the student is afforded an opportunity for a hearing in accordance with the procedures of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

]."

Suspension appropriate where conduct threatens safety and welfare of other students. —

Pursuant to this section, a student may temporarily have his educational services suspended if his conduct threatens the safety and welfare of other students and school employees and thereby interferes with the school district's obligation to provide an equal opportunity for a quality education to all the students of that district. RM v. Washakie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 2004 WY 162, 102 P.3d 868,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 2004).

When exceptions to section triggered. —

In order to trigger the need to satisfy the exceptions contained in subsection (e), the suspension or expulsion envisioned must fall within the parameters of “additional punishment for offenses punishable under the laws of the state.” Clements v. Board of Trustees, 585 P.2d 197,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1978).

Educational opportunity held not denied. —

Where two students were expelled for one year for selling marijuana, the state constitution did not require that the school district had to provide them with an alternate education. They had been lawfully expelled, the district's actions were the least onerous means of accomplishing its compelling interest in providing for the safety and welfare of its students, and the students had not been denied all educational opportunity as they could have chosen to return to school after their suspensions. RM v. Washakie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 2004 WY 162, 102 P.3d 868,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 2004).

Mootness. —

School district's appeal of a judgment overturning its decision to expel a student from high school for violations of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 21-4-305(a) and 21-4-306(a)(v) was dismissed as moot, where the student had served his sentence of suspension, complied with the terms of a behavior contract, and graduated from high school. Bd. of Trs. Fremont County Sch. Dist. #25 v. BM, 2006 WY 23, 129 P.3d 317,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2006).

Law reviews. —

For comment on Goss v. Lopez, 419 U.S. 565, 95 S. Ct. 729, 42 L. Ed. 2d 725, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 23 (1975), and particularly its effect in Wyoming, see X Land & Water L. Rev. 607 (1975).

For comment, “Education for Handicapped Children in Wyoming: What Constitutes a Free Appropriate Public Education and Other Administrative Hurdles,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 225 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of student to hearing on charges before suspension or expulsion from educational institution, 58 ALR2d 903.

Admissibility of hearsay evidence in student disciplinary proceedings, 30 ALR4th 935.

§ 21-4-306.
Suspension or expulsion; grounds.

The following shall be grounds for suspension or expulsion of a child from a public school during the school year:

Continued willful disobedience or open defiance of the authority of school personnel;

Willful destruction or defacing of school property during the school year or any recess or vacation;

Any behavior which in the judgment of the local board of trustees is clearly detrimental to the education, welfare, safety or morals of other pupils, including the use of foul, profane or abusive language or habitually disruptive behavior as defined by subsection (b) of this section;

Torturing, tormenting, or abusing a pupil or in any way maltreating a pupil or a teacher with physical violence;

Possession, use, transfer, carrying or selling a deadly weapon as defined under W.S. 6-1-104(a)(iv) within any school bus as defined by W.S. 31-7-102(a)(xl) or within the boundaries of real property used by the district primarily for the education of students in grades kindergarten through twelve (12).

As used in paragraph (a)(iii) of this section, “habitually disruptive behavior” means overt behavior willfully initiated by a student causing disruption in the classroom, on school grounds, on school vehicles or at school activities or events, which requires the attention of a teacher or other school personnel.

The board of trustees shall, subject to the case-by-case modification permitted by subsection (d) of this section, require the district superintendent to expel from school for a period of one (1) year any student determined to violate paragraph (a)(v) of this section.

The superintendent with the approval of the board of trustees may modify the period of any expulsion on a case-by-case basis based upon the circumstances of the violation. Upon a violation of paragraph (a)(v) of this section and following notice and hearing requirements of W.S.

21-4-305

, the superintendent shall notify the district attorney of the violation together with the specific act in violation of paragraph (a)(v) of this section and the name of the student violating paragraph (a)(v) of this section. Nothing in this section prohibits a district from providing educational services to the expelled student in an alternative setting.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 62; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-62; Laws 1977, ch. 16, § 1; 1995, ch. 57, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 501; 1998, ch. 49, § 1; 2019 ch. 164, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (c) and (d).

Subsection (a)(iii) is constitutional on its face.

Clements v. Board of Trustees, 585 P.2d 197,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1978).

Purpose of suspension from school. —

While it cannot be denied that the imposition of a suspension from school has certain punitive effects, the underlying purpose of a school board's action and the provisions of subsection (a)(iii) is the protection of other students — not the vindication of public justice. Clements v. Board of Trustees, 585 P.2d 197,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1978).

Disciplinable out-of-school conduct. —

It is generally accepted that school authorities may discipline pupils for out-of-school conduct having a direct and immediate effect on the discipline or general welfare of the school. Clements v. Board of Trustees, 585 P.2d 197,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1978).

Mootness. —

School district's appeal of a judgment overturning its decision to expel a student from high school for violations of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 21-4-305(a) and 21-4-306(a)(v) was dismissed as moot, where the student had served his sentence of suspension, complied with the terms of a behavior contract, and graduated from high school. Bd. of Trs. Fremont County Sch. Dist. #25 v. BM, 2006 WY 23, 129 P.3d 317,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2006).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Education for Handicapped Children in Wyoming: What Constitutes a Free Appropriate Public Education and Other Administrative Hurdles,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 225 (1984).

§ 21-4-307.
Denial of admission to school.

The board of trustees of any school district within the state may deny admission to any child who:

Has completed the twelfth grade; or

Has such a mental or physical disability that based upon a physician’s certificate the board believes such child could not reasonably benefit from the programs available or the attendance of such child would be inimical to the health, safety, or welfare of other pupils; provided, that the board shall make the best possible provision for suitable and adequate education of such child in accordance with the laws of this state.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 63; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-63.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Education for Handicapped Children in Wyoming: What Constitutes a Free Appropriate Public Education and Other Administrative Hurdles,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 225 (1984).

§ 21-4-308.
Punishment and disciplinary measures; denial of diploma or credit.

Each board of trustees in each school district within the state may adopt rules for reasonable forms of punishment and disciplinary measures. Subject to such rules, teachers, principals, and superintendents in such district may impose reasonable forms of punishment and disciplinary measures for insubordination, disobedience, and other misconduct.

Teachers, principals and superintendents in each district shall be immune from civil and criminal liability in the exercise of reasonable corporal discipline of a student as authorized by board policy.

No diploma or credit for a course which has been completed successfully shall be denied a pupil who has earned it; provided, such diploma or credit shall not be deemed earned until payment has been made for all indebtedness due to the school district.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 64; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-64; Laws 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 507.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Student's right to compel school officials to issue degree, diploma, or the like, 11 ALR4th 1182.